District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.05

Public outreach.

The Ombudsman Program shall implement innovative strategies and tools to maximize its outreach to consumers, including provision of the following accessible information sources and services:

(1)

A toll-free 1-800 telephone number that operates in the District metropolitan area;

(2)

A website on the Internet;

(3)

In-person counseling;

(4)

Establishing relationships with organizations in each ward of the city to provide outreach and receive referrals;

(5)

Active liaison, partnership, and information sharing with community, consumer, health, disability, religious, ethnic-based organizations, and other organizations; and

(6)

A one-page, easy-to-read flyer describing the Ombudsman Program’s services that shall be available to the public.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 6, 52 DCR 1981